Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,138
Commercial drivers' licenses and restricted commercial drivers' licenses; classification.

(1) Commercial drivers' licenses and restricted commercial drivers' licenses shall be issued by the department in compliance with 49 C.F.R. parts 380, 382, 383, 384, 391, and 392, shall be classified as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and shall bear such endorsements and restrictions as are provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(2) Commercial motor vehicle classifications for purposes of commercial drivers' licenses shall be as follows:

(a) Class A Combination Vehicle — Any combination of motor vehicles and towed vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than twenty-six thousand pounds if the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicles being towed are in excess of ten thousand pounds;

(b) Class B Heavy Straight Vehicle — Any single commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds or more or any such commercial motor vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not exceeding ten thousand pounds; and

(c) Class C Small Vehicle — Any single commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than twenty-six thousand one pounds or any such commercial motor vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not exceeding ten thousand pounds comprising:

(i) Motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the driver; and

(ii) Motor vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials and required to be placarded pursuant to section 75-364.

(3) The endorsements to a commercial driver's license shall be as follows:

(a) T — Double/triple trailers;

(b) P — Passenger;

(c) N — Tank vehicle;

(d) H — Hazardous materials;

(e) X — Combination tank vehicle and hazardous materials; and

(f) S — School bus.

(4) The restrictions to a commercial driver's license shall be as follows:

(a) E — No manual transmission equipped commercial motor vehicle;

(b) K — Operation of a commercial motor vehicle only in intrastate commerce;

(c) L — Operation of only a commercial motor vehicle which is not equipped with air brakes;

(d) M — Operation of a commercial motor vehicle which is not a Class A passenger vehicle;

(e) N — Operation of a commercial motor vehicle which is not a Class A or Class B passenger vehicle;

(f) O — No tractor-trailer commercial motor vehicle;

(g) V — Operation of a commercial motor vehicle for drivers with medical variance documentation. The documentation shall be required to be carried on the driver's person while operating a commercial motor vehicle; and

(h) Z — No full air brake equipped commercial motor vehicle.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 88;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 938, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 10;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 24;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 61;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 60;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 27.